Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.642.050

Authority of superintendent of public instruction—Administrative orders.

The superintendent of public instruction has the power to enforce and obtain compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and guidelines adopted under this chapter, by appropriate order made pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. The order may include, but is not limited to, termination of all or part of state apportionment or categorical moneys to the offending school district, termination of specified programs in which violations may be flagrant within the offending school district, institution of corrective action, and the placement of the offending school district on probation with appropriate sanctions until compliance is achieved.

[ 2010 c 240 s 6.]